Utah statutes.
26A-1-116.   Allocation of state funds to local health departments -- Formula.

(1) (a)  The Departments of Health and Environmental Quality shall each establish by rule a formula for allocating state funds by contract to local health departments.

(b)  This formula shall provide for allocation of funds based on need.

(c)  Determination of need shall be based on population unless the department making the rule establishes by valid and accepted data that other defined factors are relevant and reliable indicators of need.

(d)  The formula shall include a differential to compensate for additional costs of providing services in rural areas.

(2) (a)  The formulas established under Subsection (1) shall be in effect on or before July 1, 1991.

(b)  The formulas apply to all state funds appropriated by the Legislature to the Departments of Health and Environmental Quality for local health departments.

(c)  The formulas do not apply to funds a local health department receives from:

(i)  sources other than the Departments of Health and Environmental Quality; and

(ii)  the Departments of Health and Environmental Quality:

(A)  to operate a specific program within the local health department's boundaries which program is available to all residents of the state;

(B)  to meet a need that exists only within the local health department's boundaries; and

(C)  to engage in research projects.

